Idaho, session 2026, H0632.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 6-2105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2105. REMEDIES FOR EMPLOYEE BRINGING ACTION -- PROOF REQUIRED. (1)
As used in this section, "damages" means damages for injury or loss caused
by each violation of this chapter, and includes court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(2) An employee who alleges a violation of this chapter may bring a
civil action for appropriate injunctive relief or actual damages, or both,
within one hundred eighty (180) days after the occurrence of the alleged
violation of this chapter.
(3) An action begun under pursuant to this section may be brought in
the district court for the county where the alleged violation occurred, the
county where the complainant resides, or the county where the person against
whom the civil complaint is filed resides or has his principal place of busi-
ness.
(4) To prevail in an action brought under the authority of this section,
the employee shall establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
employee has suffered an adverse action because the employee, or a person
acting on his behalf, engaged or intended to engage in an activity protected
under section 6-2104 or 6-2110, Idaho Code.
(5)(a) In no action brought pursuant to this chapter shall a judgment
for noneconomic damages be entered for a claimant exceeding the limita-
tion on damages contained in section 6-1603(1), Idaho Code.
(b) The limitation contained in this subsection shall apply to the sum
of noneconomic damages sustained by a claimant.
(c) Governmental entities and their employees shall not be liable for
punitive damages on any claim allowed under the provisions of this sec-
tion.


SECTION 2. That Chapter 21, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-2110, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
6-2110. PUBLIC EMPLOYEE COMMUNICATIONS WITH THE LEGISLATURE -- PRO-
TECTIONS. (1) An employee may communicate in good faith with any member of
the Idaho legislature, any member of a legislative committee, or legisla-
tive staff regarding information, data, analysis, or professional exper-
tise, whether or not such communication constitutes a report of any type of
abuse or any type of waste or violation of law pursuant to section 6-2104,
Idaho Code. For purposes of this subsection, an employee communicates in
good faith if there is a reasonable basis in fact for the communication. Good
faith is lacking where the employee knew or reasonably ought to have known
that a communication is malicious, false, or frivolous.
(2) An employer shall not take or threaten adverse action against an em-
ployee because the employee:
(a) Communicated in good faith with any member of the Idaho legis-
lature, any member of a legislative committee, or legislative staff
regarding information, data, analysis, or professional expertise,
whether or not such communication constitutes a report of any type
of abuse or any type of waste or violation of law pursuant to section
6-2104, Idaho Code;
(b) Provided information or assistance in response to a legislative re-
quest made pursuant to section 74-127, Idaho Code; or
(c) Participated in a legislative hearing, briefing, inquiry, or pro-
ceeding regarding information, data, analysis, or professional exper-
tise, whether or not such communication constitutes a report of any type
of abuse or any type of waste or violation of law pursuant to section
6-2104, Idaho Code.
(3) No employer may adopt, enforce, or maintain any policy, rule, di-
rective, practice, or agreement, written or unwritten, that:
(a) Prohibits or restricts employee communication with any member of
the Idaho legislature, any member of a legislative committee, or leg-
islative staff regarding information, data, analysis, or professional
expertise, whether or not such communication constitutes a report of
any type of abuse or any type of waste or violation of law pursuant to
section 6-2104, Idaho Code;
(b) Requires prior approval, notification, or authorization before
such communication; or
(c) Subjects an employee to discipline or retaliation for such communi-
cation.
(4) Protection under this section applies only to communications made
in good faith and does not authorize knowingly false statements or unlawful
disclosure of confidential information.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 1, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 74-127, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
74-127. LEGISLATIVE PUBLIC RECORDS REQUESTS -- AGENCY DUTY TO RE-
SPOND. (1) Every agency shall respond in good faith and as provided in this


section to a public records request from a member of the Idaho legislature,
a legislative committee or subcommittee, or legislative services office
staff acting on behalf of the legislature. For the purposes of this section,
"agency" means any department, board, commission, office, or institution in
the executive branch of the Idaho state government.
(2) Unless a different deadline is specified by law or agreed to by the
requesting legislator or committee, the agency shall acknowledge receipt of
the request within three (3) working days and shall provide a substantive re-
sponse within ten (10) working days of receipt.
(3) If the agency cannot reasonably provide a substantive response
within ten (10) working days, it shall within that period provide written no-
tice explaining the reason for delay and provide a date certain for response
not to exceed an additional ten (10) working days, absent extraordinary cir-
cumstances.
(4) A substantive response may include records, data, explanations,
analysis, or other information responsive to the request, including identi-
fication of information not maintained by the agency.
(5) Nothing in this section requires disclosure of information made
confidential by state or federal law or otherwise exempt from disclosure
pursuant to this chapter. The agency shall identify the legal basis for
nondisclosure and provide any reasonably segregable nonconfidential infor-
mation.
SECTION 4. That Section 74-127, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-127 74-128. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby de-
clared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of
such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any rea-
son, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.